Illinois, session 104th, HB2807.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by adding 5Section 18 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/18 new)7    Sec. 18. Restrictions on advertising. A licensee under 8this Act may not advertise its video gaming operation using 9physical advertisements outside the video gaming location or 10on off-premises billboard signs unless the advertisement is 11directly and permanently affixed to a building on the video 12gaming location or on a permanent pole sign that is 13permanently affixed to a foundation. This Section does not 14apply in the first 90 days after a video gaming location is 15issued a license.